Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3211
Appeal; procedure.

Any applicant, licensee, or other person directly and adversely affected by any order of the secretary may appeal such order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 11, p. 1200;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 130.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.